Maryland, session 2025, SB0060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
– 1 –

Ch. 685 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(M) THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–861 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS IN THE SAME MANNER THEY APPLY TO CARRIERS.
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxiii) Beginning on July 1, 2025, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, coverage for biomarker
testing in accordance with § 15–859 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxiv) Beginning on January 1, 2025, shall provide coverage for
prostheses in accordance with § 15–844 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXV) BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2026, SHALL PROVIDE
CALCIUM SCORE TESTING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–861 OF THE INSURANCE
ARTICLE.
Article – Insurance
15–861.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(B) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
CALCIUM SCORE TESTING IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MOST RECENT GUIDELINES
ISSUED BY THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF CARDIOLOGY THAT EXPAND THE SCOPE OF
PREVENTIVE CARE SERVICES FOR THE BENEFIT OF CONSUMERS FOR INDIVIDUALS
WHO HAVE AT LEAST THREE OF THE FOLLOWING RISK FACTORS:
(1) DIABETES;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 685
(2) HIGH BLOOD PRESSURE;
(3) HIGH CHOLESTEROL; OR
(4) A FAMILY HISTORY OF PREMATURE CORONARY ARTERY DISEASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –